District of Columbia statutes.
1-1207

Foreign bills of exchange.

Notaries public shall have authority to demand acceptance and payment of foreign bills of exchange and to protest the same for nonacceptance and nonpayment, and to exercise such other powers and duties as by the law of nations and according to commercial usages notaries public may do.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1279, ch. 854, § 565

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-807.
1973 Ed., § 1-508.